Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2914
Road, street, or highway construction projects excluded; water, wastewater, utility, or sewer construction projects permitted.

(1) A political subdivision shall not use a design-build contract, construction management at risk contract, or public-private partnership contract under the Political Subdivisions Construction Alternatives Act for a project, in whole or in part, for road, street, or highway construction.

(2) A city of the metropolitan class may use a design-build contract, construction management at risk contract, or public-private partnership contract under the Political Subdivisions Construction Alternatives Act for the purpose of complying with state or federal requirements to control or minimize overflows from combined sewers.

(3) A political subdivision may use a design-build contract, construction management at risk contract, or public-private partnership contract under the Political Subdivisions Construction Alternatives Act for a project, in whole or in part, for water, wastewater, utility, or sewer construction.

Laws 2008, LB889, § 14;

Laws 2019, LB583, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB414, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 48.
July 18, 2026